Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3706
Consideration,
defined.

Consideration means the
monetary charge for the use of space in a hotel only if the space is one ordinarily
used for accommodations and shall not include the charge for any food or beverage
served or personal services rendered to the occupant of such space.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1248;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 6.